Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB28.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 1556. Black History Education.--(a) The department shall have the following duties:(1) Within three (3) months of the effective date of this section, develop and disseminate material and other related resources for school entities to integrate the history of the Black experience in an appropriate required or elective course of study curriculum. The instruction shall be age appropriate and sequential.(2) Update and disseminate the material and other related 1234567891011121314151617181920 resources under paragraph (1) as needed.(3) Affix a link to the material and other related resources under paragraph (1), or any update of the material and other related resources, on the department's equity and inclusion publicly accessible Internet website or, if relabeled or discontinued, any similar type of publicly accessible Internet website maintained by the department.(4) Develop guidelines for school entities that design a program or course of study dedicated to the instruction of the history of the Black experience to submit a link to the department to the program or course of study material and a designated contact person for an interested person to obtain additional information or assistance with designing a similar program or course of study. The department shall affix the submitted information on the department's equity and inclusion publicly accessible Internet website or, if relabeled or discontinued, any similar type of publicly accessible Internet website maintained by the department.(b) A school entity may utilize the material and other related resources developed by the department or any appropriate public or private materials, personnel and other resources in integrating the instruction into its curriculum under subsection (a).(c) As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Department." The Department of Education of the Commonwealth."School entity." A school district, intermediate unit, area career and technical school, charter school, cyber charter 20250SB0028PN0010 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 school, regional charter school or private or nonpublic school.Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20250SB0028PN0010 - 3 - 12